Florida, session 2026, SB1346.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âPresent subsection (12) of section 501.1739, 15 Florida Statutes, as created by SB ___ or similar legislation, 16 2026 Regular Session, is redesignated as subsection (13), and a 17 new subsection (12) is added to that section, to read: 18 501.1739âCompanion artificial intelligence chatbots; system 19 operators regulated.â 20 (12)(a)âAll information received by the department pursuant 21 to a notification of a violation under this section or an 22 investigation of a violation of this section is confidential and 23 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 24 Constitution, until such time as the investigation is completed 25 or ceases to be active. This exemption shall be construed in 26 conformity with s. 119.071(2)(c). 27 (b)âDuring an active investigation, information made 28 confidential and exempt pursuant to paragraph (a) may be 29 disclosed by the department: 30 1.âIn the furtherance of its official duties and 31 responsibilities; 32 2.âFor print, publication, or broadcast if the department 33 determines that such release would assist in notifying the 34 public or locating or identifying a person whom the department 35 believes to be a victim of an improper use or disposal of 36 customer records, except that information made confidential and 37 exempt by paragraph (c) may not be released pursuant to this 38 subparagraph; or 39 3.âTo another governmental entity in the furtherance of its 40 official duties and responsibilities. 41 (c)âUpon completion of an investigation or once an 42 investigation ceases to be active, the following information 43 held by the department shall remain confidential and exempt from 44 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution: 45 1.âInformation that is otherwise confidential or exempt 46 from s. 119.07(1) or s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 47 2.âPersonal identifying information. 48 3.âA computer forensic report. 49 4.âInformation that would otherwise reveal weaknesses in 50 the data security of the operator. 51 5.âInformation that would disclose the proprietary 52 information of the operator. 53 (d)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âproprietary 54 informationâ means information that: 55 1.âIs owned or controlled by the operator; 56 2.âIs intended to be private and is treated by the operator 57 as private because disclosure would harm the operator or their 58 business operations; 59 3.âHas not been disclosed except as required by law or a 60 private agreement that provides that the information will not be 61 released to the public; 62 4.âIs not publicly available or otherwise readily 63 ascertainable through proper means from another source in the 64 same configuration as received by the department; and 65 5.âReveals competitive interests, the disclosure of which 66 would impair the competitive advantage of the operator that is 67 the subject of the information. 68 (e)âThis subsection is subject to the Open Government 69 Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand 70 repealed on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from 71 repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 72 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 73 necessity that all information received by the Department of 74 Legal Affairs pursuant to a notification of a violation of s. 75 501.1739, Florida Statutes, or an investigation under that 76 section be made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), 77 Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State 78 Constitution for the following reasons: 79 (1)âA notification of a violation of s. 501.1739, Florida 80 Statutes, may result in an investigation of such violation. The 81 premature release of such information could frustrate or thwart 82 the investigation and impair the ability of the department to 83 effectively and efficiently administer s. 501.1739, Florida 84 Statutes. In addition, release of such information before 85 completion of an active investigation could jeopardize the 86 ongoing investigation. 87 (2)âRelease of information to which another public records 88 exemption applies once an investigation is completed or ceases 89 to be active would undo the specific statutory exemption 90 protecting that information. 91 (3)âAn investigation of a violation of s. 501.1739, Florida 92 Statutes, is likely to result in the gathering of sensitive 93 personal information, including identification numbers, unique 94 identifiers, professional or employment-related information, and 95 personal financial information. Such information could be used 96 for the purpose of identity theft. The release of such 97 information could subject possible victims of violations 98 relating to artificial intelligence to further harm. 99 (4)âNotices received by the department and information 100 received during an investigation of a violation of s. 501.1739, 101 Florida Statutes, are likely to contain proprietary information. 102 Such information, including trade secrets, derives its 103 independent, economic value, actual or potential, from being 104 generally unknown to, and not readily ascertainable by, other 105 persons who might obtain economic value from its disclosure or 106 use. Allowing public access to proprietary information, 107 including a trade secret, through a public records request could 108 destroy the value of the proprietary information and cause a 109 financial loss to the operator. Release of such information 110 could give business competitors an unfair advantage. 111 (5)âInformation received by the department may contain a 112 computer forensic report or information that could reveal 113 weaknesses in the data security of an operator. The release of 114 this information could result in the identification of 115 vulnerabilities in the cybersecurity system of the operator and 116 be used to harm the operator and its clients. 117 (6)âThe harm that may result from the release of 118 information received by the department pursuant to a 119 notification or investigation by the department of a violation 120 of s. 501.1739, Florida Statutes, could impair the effective and 121 efficient administration of the investigation and, thus, 122 outweighs the public benefit that may be derived from the 123 disclosure of the information. 124 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 125 SB ___ or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 126 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 127 thereof and becomes a law.